Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.261

Waiver—Determination.

The director shall, within thirty days following submission of a written petition for waiver of the insurance requirements found in RCW 18.44.201, issue a written determination granting or rejecting an applicant's request for waiver.

[ 2000 c 171 s 13; 1987 c 471 s 6. Formerly RCW 18.44.385.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1987 c 471: See notes following RCW 18.44.231.